Illinois, session 104th, HB2567.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 6A-1 and 6A-7 and by adding Section 6A-1.5 as 6follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/6A-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6A-1)8    Sec. 6A-1. County board of election commissioners. 9    (a) Any county in which there is no city, village or 10incorporated town with a board of election commissioners may 11establish a county board of election commissioners either (1) 12by ordinance of the county board or (2) by vote of the electors 13of the county in accordance with subsection (a) of Section 146A-2.15    The fact that some territory in a county is within the 16corporate limits of a city, village or incorporated town with 17a board of election commissioners does not prevent that county 18from establishing a county board of election commissioners in 19accordance with this Article if no portion of such city, 20village or incorporated town was within the county at the time 21of the establishment of the board of election commissioners 22for such city, village or incorporated town. If such a county 23establishes a county board of election commissioners pursuant   HB2567- 2 -LRB104 11148 SPS 21230 b1to this Article, the county board of election commissioners 2shall, with respect to the territory in the county within the 3corporate limits of the city, village or incorporated town, 4supersede the board of election commissioners of that city, 5village or incorporated town.6    (b) Any county with a population of more than 700,000 7persons as of the 2010 federal decennial census that borders 8another state and borders no more than 2 other Illinois 9counties, shall be subject to a county board of election 10commissioners beginning 90 days after the effective date of 11this amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly.12    (c) Any county with a population of less than 300,000 13200,000 but more than 175,000 persons as of the 2020 2010 14federal decennial census in which a city, village, or 15incorporated town with a board of election commissioners is 16located may establish a county board of election commissioners 17by vote of the electors of the county in accordance with 18subsection (b) of Section 6A-2. If such a county establishes a 19county board of election commissioners, the county board of 20election commissioners, with respect to the territory in the 21county within the corporate limits of the city, village, or 22incorporated town, shall supersede the board of election 23commissioners of that city, village, or incorporated town. 24(Source: P.A. 98-115, eff. 7-29-13.) 25    (10 ILCS 5/6A-1.5 new)  HB2567- 3 -LRB104 11148 SPS 21230 b1    Sec. 6A-1.5. Expansion of a municipal board of election 2commissioners. Any county in which there is a city, village, 3or incorporated town with a board of election commissioners 4may establish that municipal board of election commissioners 5as a county board of election commissioners. The municipal 6board of election commissioners may not be established as a 7county board of election commissioners until the question of 8establishing the county board of election commissioners has 9been submitted to the electors of the county in which the 10municipality is located at a regular election and approved by 11a majority of the electors voting on the question. The 12election authority shall submit the question in substantially 13the following form:14        Shall the (name of municipality) board of election 15    commissioners be established as the (name of county) board 16    of election commissioners?17    The election authority must record the votes as "Yes" or 18"No".19    If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote 20in the affirmative, the municipal board of election 21commissioners shall be established as the board of election 22commissioners for the county in which the municipality is 23located. 24    (10 ILCS 5/6A-7)  (from Ch. 46, par. 6A-7)25    Sec. 6A-7. Dissolution.   HB2567- 4 -LRB104 11148 SPS 21230 b1    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), any county which 2has established a board of election commissioners may 3subsequently vote to dissolve such board in the same manner as 4provided in Article 6 for cities, villages, and incorporated 5towns, except that the question of dissolving the board of 6election commissioners shall be submitted to the electors of 7the county at a regular election and approved by a majority of 8the electors voting on the question. The question shall be in 9substantially the following form: the petition to the circuit 10court to submit to the vote of the electors of the county the 11proposition to dissolve the board of election commissioners 12shall be signed by at least 10% of the registered voters of the 13county.14        Shall the (name of county) Board of Election 15    Commissioners be dissolved? 16    The election authority must record the votes as "Yes" or 17"No". 18    If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote 19in the affirmative, the county may dissolve the board of 20election. 21    (b) A county board in a county that has established a 22county board of election commissioners in accordance with 23subsection (a) of Section 6A-1 of this Code may, by ordinance 24or resolution, dissolve the county board of election 25commissioners and transfer its functions to the county clerk. 26(Source: P.A. 100-628, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.)